hunspell-en-ru/src/wiki_ru_RU.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1558 Y 1
SFX 1558 0 альном .
SFX 1102 Y 1
SFX 1102 0 ировавшись .
SFX 340 Y 1
SFX 340 0 ится .
SFX 1191 Y 1
SFX 1191 0 ивайте .
SFX 516 Y 1
SFX 516 0 рами .
SFX 614 Y 1
SFX 614 0 вающийся .
SFX 1824 Y 1
SFX 1824 0 ицами .
SFX 2126 Y 1
SFX 2126 0 льницей .
SFX 1489 Y 1
SFX 1489 0 щицей .
SFX 2321 Y 1
SFX 2321 0 анные .
SFX 673 Y 1
SFX 673 0 анный .
SFX 2320 Y 1
SFX 2320 0 анным .
SFX 1579 Y 1
SFX 1579 0 истка .
SFX 1575 Y 1
SFX 1575 0 истке .
SFX 1574 Y 1
SFX 1574 0 истки .
SFX 1715 Y 1
SFX 1715 0 чат .
SFX 2088 Y 1
SFX 2088 0 чах .
SFX 846 Y 1
SFX 846 0 льна .
SFX 815 Y 1
SFX 815 0 льно .
SFX 1500 Y 1
SFX 1500 0 овскими .
SFX 1316 Y 1
SFX 1316 0 ывают .
SFX 2140 Y 1
SFX 2140 0 озами .
SFX 826 Y 1
SFX 826 0 са .
SFX 961 Y 1
SFX 961 0 се .
SFX 2521 Y 1
SFX 2521 0 ск .
SFX 2845 Y 1
SFX 2845 0 яющий .
SFX 101 Y 1
SFX 101 0 ься .
SFX 2104 Y 1
SFX 2104 0 ору .
SFX 2136 Y 1
SFX 2136 0 оры .
SFX 1058 Y 1
SFX 1058 0 нную .
SFX 930 Y 1
SFX 930 0 ьное .
SFX 922 Y 1
SFX 922 0 ьной .
SFX 928 Y 1
SFX 928 0 ьном .
SFX 720 Y 1
SFX 720 0 щикам .
SFX 429 Y 1
SFX 429 0 емся .
SFX 2217 Y 1
SFX 2217 0 льщик .
SFX 1923 Y 1
SFX 1923 0 инкою .
SFX 677 Y 1
SFX 677 0 ваниям .
SFX 1938 Y 1
SFX 1938 0 льностей .
SFX 279 Y 1
SFX 279 0 ностями .
SFX 2409 Y 1
SFX 2409 0 лениям .
SFX 2768 Y 1
SFX 2768 0 изировалось .
SFX 507 Y 1
SFX 507 0 щихся .
SFX 1839 Y 1
SFX 1839 0 тую .
SFX 2022 Y 1
SFX 2022 0 ищами .
SFX 1868 Y 1
SFX 1868 0 руют .
SFX 1448 Y 1
SFX 1448 0 дах .
SFX 1142 Y 1
SFX 1142 0 ающее .
SFX 1141 Y 1
SFX 1141 0 ающей .
SFX 1140 Y 1
SFX 1140 0 ающем .
SFX 1785 Y 1
SFX 1785 0 истыми .
SFX 1468 Y 1
SFX 1468 0 тельные .
SFX 1126 Y 1
SFX 1126 0 тельный .
SFX 1467 Y 1
SFX 1467 0 тельным .
SFX 1959 Y 1
SFX 1959 0 изируйте .
SFX 2381 Y 1
SFX 2381 0 кать .
SFX 606 Y 1
SFX 606 0 ваюсь .
SFX 2634 Y 1
SFX 2634 0 нцами .
SFX 1194 Y 1
SFX 1194 0 анью .
SFX 1207 Y 1
SFX 1207 0 анья .
SFX 1615 Y 1
SFX 1615 0 ываетесь .
SFX 46 Y 1
SFX 46 0 йся .
SFX 1773 Y 1
SFX 1773 0 нит .
SFX 592 Y 1
SFX 592 0 ниц .
SFX 475 Y 1
SFX 475 0 нию .
SFX 472 Y 1
SFX 472 0 ния .
SFX 2504 Y 1
SFX 2504 0 ниными .
SFX 1104 Y 1
SFX 1104 0 чках .
SFX 1772 Y 1
SFX 1772 0 овавшийся .
SFX 1832 Y 1
SFX 1832 0 енные .
SFX 665 Y 1
SFX 665 0 енный .
SFX 1831 Y 1
SFX 1831 0 енным .
SFX 1605 Y 1
SFX 1605 0 ываются .
SFX 2209 Y 1
SFX 2209 0 ичностей .
SFX 243 Y 1
SFX 243 0 ались .
SFX 1550 Y 1
SFX 1550 0 альною .
SFX 2705 Y 1
SFX 2705 0 ющимся .
SFX 1682 Y 1
SFX 1682 0 ывавшая .
SFX 2680 Y 1
SFX 2680 0 нков .
SFX 1148 Y 1
SFX 1148 0 нкой .
SFX 2614 Y 1
SFX 2614 0 дите .
SFX 1253 Y 1
SFX 1253 0 ющими .
SFX 446 Y 1
SFX 446 0 вающий .
SFX 2772 Y 1
SFX 2772 0 изировавшийся .
SFX 2786 Y 1
SFX 2786 0 изируется .
SFX 538 Y 1
SFX 538 0 вался .
SFX 160 Y 1
SFX 160 0 шься .
SFX 1711 Y 1
SFX 1711 0 ивавшего .
SFX 2125 Y 1
SFX 2125 0 льницею .
SFX 1488 Y 1
SFX 1488 0 щицею .
SFX 2318 Y 1
SFX 2318 0 анных .
SFX 1573 Y 1
SFX 1573 0 истку .
SFX 1301 Y 1
SFX 1301 0 киной .
SFX 1991 Y 1
SFX 1991 0 иванием .
SFX 847 Y 1
SFX 847 0 льны .
SFX 1353 Y 1
SFX 1353 0 овкой .
SFX 2476 Y 1
SFX 2476 0 авшаяся .
SFX 1308 Y 1
SFX 1308 0 ывала .
SFX 1307 Y 1
SFX 1307 0 ывали .
SFX 1306 Y 1
SFX 1306 0 ывало .
SFX 2998 Y 1
SFX 2998 0 ляются .
SFX 1218 Y 1
SFX 1218 0 ём .
SFX 2806 Y 1
SFX 2806 0 ровались .
SFX 2992 Y 1
SFX 2992 0 па .
SFX 1651 Y 1
SFX 1651 0 уемся .
SFX 207 Y 1
SFX 207 0 щему .
SFX 644 Y 1
SFX 644 0 нуть .
SFX 1074 Y 1
SFX 1074 0 ст .
SFX 960 Y 1
SFX 960 0 су .
SFX 1002 Y 1
SFX 1002 0 сы .
SFX 8 Y 1
SFX 8 0 сь .
SFX 6 Y 1
SFX 6 0 ся .
SFX 1888 Y 1
SFX 1888 0 ывание .
SFX 1886 Y 1
SFX 1886 0 ывании .
SFX 1885 Y 1
SFX 1885 0 ываний .
SFX 924 Y 1
SFX 924 0 ьною .
SFX 718 Y 1
SFX 718 0 щиках .
SFX 2393 Y 1
SFX 2393 0 ствовавшая .
SFX 675 Y 1
SFX 675 0 ваниях .
SFX 339 Y 1
SFX 339 0 имся .
SFX 1344 Y 1
SFX 1344 0 ировавшему .
SFX 2407 Y 1
SFX 2407 0 лениях .
SFX 2474 Y 1
SFX 2474 0 авшееся .
SFX 499 Y 1
SFX 499 0 там .
SFX 1930 Y 1
SFX 1930 0 стого .
SFX 1960 Y 1
SFX 1960 0 изируй .
SFX 2315 Y 1
SFX 2315 0 ельницами .
SFX 481 Y 1
SFX 481 0 цами .
SFX 1502 Y 1
SFX 1502 0 овские .
SFX 1050 Y 1
SFX 1050 0 овский .
SFX 1501 Y 1
SFX 1501 0 овским .
SFX 1138 Y 1
SFX 1138 0 ающею .
SFX 2547 Y 1
SFX 2547 0 нское .
SFX 2490 Y 1
SFX 2490 0 нской .
SFX 2244 Y 1
SFX 2244 0 нском .
SFX 1465 Y 1
SFX 1465 0 тельных .
SFX 1338 Y 1
SFX 1338 0 ировавшую .
SFX 179 Y 1
SFX 179 0 айте .
SFX 2827 Y 1
SFX 2827 0 рскими .
SFX 247 Y 1
SFX 247 0 ешь .
SFX 2594 Y 1
SFX 2594 0 рование .
SFX 2910 Y 1
SFX 2910 0 ровании .
SFX 2909 Y 1
SFX 2909 0 рований .
SFX 2855 Y 1
SFX 2855 0 тиками .
SFX 1829 Y 1
SFX 1829 0 енных .
SFX 1143 Y 1
SFX 1143 0 ающего .
SFX 2612 Y 1
SFX 2612 0 каете .
SFX 1902 Y 1
SFX 1902 0 инками .
SFX 889 Y 1
SFX 889 0 итов .
SFX 851 Y 1
SFX 851 0 итом .
SFX 1517 Y 1
SFX 1517 0 онами .
SFX 2268 Y 1
SFX 2268 0 ска .
SFX 2584 Y 1
SFX 2584 0 ске .
SFX 1175 Y 1
SFX 1175 0 ски .
SFX 2141 Y 1
SFX 2141 0 озам .
SFX 1992 Y 1
SFX 1992 0 ивание .
SFX 1990 Y 1
SFX 1990 0 ивании .
SFX 1989 Y 1
SFX 1989 0 иваний .
SFX 2464 Y 1
SFX 2464 0 ившаяся .
SFX 1147 Y 1
SFX 1147 0 нкою .
SFX 2224 Y 1
SFX 2224 0 ельница .
SFX 2313 Y 1
SFX 2313 0 ельнице .
SFX 1747 Y 1
SFX 1747 0 ничаешь .
SFX 353 Y 1
SFX 353 0 шемся .
SFX 1821 Y 1
SFX 1821 0 нулся .
SFX 2093 Y 1
SFX 2093 0 ичную .
SFX 2264 Y 1
SFX 2264 0 льщиков .
SFX 2302 Y 1
SFX 2302 0 льщиком .
SFX 577 Y 1
SFX 577 0 овать .
SFX 2183 Y 1
SFX 2183 0 ична .
SFX 2097 Y 1
SFX 2097 0 ично .
SFX 496 Y 1
SFX 496 0 ваемый .
SFX 2788 Y 1
SFX 2788 0 изируемся .
SFX 2469 Y 1
SFX 2469 0 авшиеся .
SFX 1089 Y 1
SFX 1089 0 ируются .
SFX 2829 Y 1
SFX 2829 0 рские .
SFX 2215 Y 1
SFX 2215 0 рский .
SFX 2828 Y 1
SFX 2828 0 рским .
SFX 508 Y 1
SFX 508 0 щимися .
SFX 1787 Y 1
SFX 1787 0 истые .
SFX 1439 Y 1
SFX 1439 0 истый .
SFX 1786 Y 1
SFX 1786 0 истым .
SFX 1866 Y 1
SFX 1866 0 ушка .
SFX 2089 Y 1
SFX 2089 0 ушке .
SFX 1995 Y 1
SFX 1995 0 ушки .
SFX 1352 Y 1
SFX 1352 0 овкою .
SFX 2290 Y 1
SFX 2290 0 аемого .
SFX 2462 Y 1
SFX 2462 0 ившееся .
SFX 1628 Y 1
SFX 1628 0 ивалось .
SFX 1403 Y 1
SFX 1403 0 очное .
SFX 1386 Y 1
SFX 1386 0 очной .
SFX 1402 Y 1
SFX 1402 0 очном .
SFX 392 Y 1
SFX 392 0 ра .
SFX 404 Y 1
SFX 404 0 ре .
SFX 1359 Y 1
SFX 1359 0 ри .
SFX 37 Y 1
SFX 37 0 шее .
SFX 31 Y 1
SFX 31 0 шей .
SFX 995 Y 1
SFX 995 0 шек .
SFX 33 Y 1
SFX 33 0 шем .
SFX 1485 Y 1
SFX 1485 0 она .
SFX 1497 Y 1
SFX 1497 0 оне .
SFX 1546 Y 1
SFX 1546 0 ёт .
SFX 2727 Y 1
SFX 2727 0 емой .
SFX 1055 Y 1
SFX 1055 0 нная .
SFX 1612 Y 1
SFX 1612 0 ывайся .
SFX 1884 Y 1
SFX 1884 0 ыванию .
SFX 1883 Y 1
SFX 1883 0 ывания .
SFX 1739 Y 1
SFX 1739 0 ничают .
SFX 2056 Y 1
SFX 2056 0 ацией .
SFX 2703 Y 1
SFX 2703 0 ющуюся .
SFX 1577 Y 1
SFX 1577 0 истками .
SFX 909 Y 1
SFX 909 0 вшейся .
SFX 1656 Y 1
SFX 1656 0 ованиям .
SFX 345 Y 1
SFX 345 0 шимся .
SFX 1509 Y 1
SFX 1509 0 мам .
SFX 2971 Y 1
SFX 2971 0 ман .
SFX 1765 Y 1
SFX 1765 0 циям .
SFX 498 Y 1
SFX 498 0 тах .
SFX 1867 Y 1
SFX 1867 0 тая .
SFX 2619 Y 1
SFX 2619 0 цевыми .
SFX 1958 Y 1
SFX 1958 0 изирую .
SFX 2018 Y 1
SFX 2018 0 изируя .
SFX 2922 Y 1
SFX 2922 0 евая .
SFX 1475 Y 1
SFX 1475 0 овских .
SFX 740 Y 1
SFX 740 0 ируй .
SFX 2489 Y 1
SFX 2489 0 нскою .
SFX 2774 Y 1
SFX 2774 0 щами .
SFX 1193 Y 1
SFX 1193 0 ивав .
SFX 1186 Y 1
SFX 1186 0 ивай .
SFX 1190 Y 1
SFX 1190 0 ивал .
SFX 1692 Y 1
SFX 1692 0 еем .
SFX 2908 Y 1
SFX 2908 0 рованию .
SFX 2907 Y 1
SFX 2907 0 рования .
SFX 1329 Y 1
SFX 1329 0 нитесь .
SFX 1965 Y 1
SFX 1965 0 изировать .
SFX 360 Y 1
SFX 360 0 ившую .
SFX 2660 Y 1
SFX 2660 0 ированное .
SFX 2659 Y 1
SFX 2659 0 ированной .
SFX 2658 Y 1
SFX 2658 0 ированном .
SFX 1809 Y 1
SFX 1809 0 лка .
SFX 2073 Y 1
SFX 2073 0 лке .
SFX 2026 Y 1
SFX 2026 0 лки .
SFX 2572 Y 1
SFX 2572 0 ску .
SFX 2139 Y 1
SFX 2139 0 озах .
SFX 1632 Y 1
SFX 1632 0 ивайся .
SFX 1988 Y 1
SFX 1988 0 иванию .
SFX 1987 Y 1
SFX 1987 0 ивания .
SFX 2310 Y 1
SFX 2310 0 ельницу .
SFX 2309 Y 1
SFX 2309 0 ельницы .
SFX 2179 Y 1
SFX 2179 0 ялась .
SFX 1642 Y 1
SFX 1642 0 уюсь .
SFX 1009 Y 1
SFX 1009 0 овавшими .
SFX 2190 Y 1
SFX 2190 0 ичны .
SFX 2365 Y 1
SFX 2365 0 ающимися .
SFX 157 Y 1
SFX 157 0 мте .
SFX 1216 Y 1
SFX 1216 0 ствовать .
SFX 1662 Y 1
SFX 1662 0 нёшь .
SFX 246 Y 1
SFX 246 0 ское .
SFX 215 Y 1
SFX 215 0 ской .
SFX 212 Y 1
SFX 212 0 ском .
SFX 2826 Y 1
SFX 2826 0 рских .
SFX 1240 Y 1
SFX 1240 0 новыми .
SFX 1381 Y 1
SFX 1381 0 очными .
SFX 1778 Y 1
SFX 1778 0 истых .
SFX 2079 Y 1
SFX 2079 0 ушку .
SFX 1640 Y 1
SFX 1640 0 емтесь .
SFX 16 Y 1
SFX 16 0 ов .
SFX 125 Y 1
SFX 125 0 ое .
SFX 2092 Y 1
SFX 2092 0 оз .
SFX 20 Y 1
SFX 20 0 ой .
SFX 158 Y 1
SFX 158 0 ок .
SFX 2943 Y 1
SFX 2943 0 ол .
SFX 15 Y 1
SFX 15 0 ом .
SFX 1154 Y 1
SFX 1154 0 он .
SFX 130 Y 1
SFX 130 0 стью .
SFX 1385 Y 1
SFX 1385 0 очною .
SFX 335 Y 1
SFX 335 0 овую .
SFX 1720 Y 1
SFX 1720 0 стами .
SFX 1684 Y 1
SFX 1684 0 нусь .
SFX 478 Y 1
SFX 478 0 ру .
SFX 489 Y 1
SFX 489 0 ры .
SFX 1917 Y 1
SFX 1917 0 рь .
SFX 1767 Y 1
SFX 1767 0 рю .
SFX 2379 Y 1
SFX 2379 0 ря .
SFX 32 Y 1
SFX 32 0 шею .
SFX 1511 Y 1
SFX 1511 0 ону .
SFX 1529 Y 1
SFX 1529 0 оны .
SFX 2457 Y 1
SFX 2457 0 ившиеся .
SFX 2726 Y 1
SFX 2726 0 емою .
SFX 1318 Y 1
SFX 1318 0 ываешь .
SFX 1743 Y 1
SFX 1743 0 ничала .
SFX 1742 Y 1
SFX 1742 0 ничали .
SFX 1741 Y 1
SFX 1741 0 ничало .
SFX 301 Y 1
SFX 301 0 вавши .
SFX 2069 Y 1
SFX 2069 0 ациею .
SFX 2667 Y 1
SFX 2667 0 яйтесь .
SFX 1710 Y 1
SFX 1710 0 ивавшее .
SFX 1709 Y 1
SFX 1709 0 ивавшей .
SFX 1708 Y 1
SFX 1708 0 ивавшем .
SFX 2767 Y 1
SFX 2767 0 изировался .
SFX 1754 Y 1
SFX 1754 0 ции .
SFX 1751 Y 1
SFX 1751 0 ций .
SFX 2017 Y 1
SFX 2017 0 ища .
SFX 1900 Y 1
SFX 1900 0 ище .
SFX 1654 Y 1
SFX 1654 0 ованиях .
SFX 853 Y 1
SFX 853 0 изм .
SFX 152 Y 1
SFX 152 0 вшийся .
SFX 805 Y 1
SFX 805 0 ерам .
SFX 1476 Y 1
SFX 1476 0 мах .
SFX 1763 Y 1
SFX 1763 0 циях .
SFX 2784 Y 1
SFX 2784 0 изируйся .
SFX 1595 Y 1
SFX 1595 0 очна .
SFX 1592 Y 1
SFX 1592 0 очно .
SFX 2352 Y 1
SFX 2352 0 тельниц .
SFX 1349 Y 1
SFX 1349 0 ировавшая .
SFX 738 Y 1
SFX 738 0 ирую .
SFX 760 Y 1
SFX 760 0 ируя .
SFX 503 Y 1
SFX 503 0 ните .
SFX 1731 Y 1
SFX 1731 0 ять .
SFX 306 Y 1
SFX 306 0 ание .
SFX 291 Y 1
SFX 291 0 ании .
SFX 287 Y 1
SFX 287 0 аний .
SFX 2980 Y 1
SFX 2980 0 тельностью .
SFX 1201 Y 1
SFX 1201 0 иваю .
SFX 1150 Y 1
SFX 1150 0 ивая .
SFX 893 Y 1
SFX 893 0 ирование .
SFX 946 Y 1
SFX 946 0 ировании .
SFX 945 Y 1
SFX 945 0 ирований .
SFX 539 Y 1
SFX 539 0 валась .
SFX 1904 Y 1
SFX 1904 0 еет .
SFX 2392 Y 1
SFX 2392 0 ствовавшего .
SFX 2367 Y 1
SFX 2367 0 ающеюся .
SFX 379 Y 1
SFX 379 0 шегося .
SFX 2656 Y 1
SFX 2656 0 ированною .
SFX 2053 Y 1
SFX 2053 0 лку .
SFX 601 Y 1
SFX 601 0 ницей .
SFX 1202 Y 1
SFX 1202 0 иваешь .
SFX 1537 Y 1
SFX 1537 0 ингам .
SFX 2076 Y 1
SFX 2076 0 ичная .
SFX 2531 Y 1
SFX 2531 0 вкам .
SFX 235 Y 1
SFX 235 0 скому .
SFX 372 Y 1
SFX 372 0 шуюся .
SFX 228 Y 1
SFX 228 0 скою .
SFX 2169 Y 1
SFX 2169 0 чную .
SFX 555 Y 1
SFX 555 0 уем .
SFX 1115 Y 1
SFX 1115 0 ирующийся .
SFX 695 Y 1
SFX 695 0 ьям .
SFX 1929 Y 1
SFX 1929 0 стые .
SFX 1561 Y 1
SFX 1561 0 стый .
SFX 1928 Y 1
SFX 1928 0 стым .
SFX 1065 Y 1
SFX 1065 0 ьна .
SFX 1057 Y 1
SFX 1057 0 ьно .
SFX 584 Y 1
SFX 584 0 овав .
SFX 573 Y 1
SFX 573 0 овал .
SFX 1814 Y 1
SFX 1814 0 ор .
SFX 50 Y 1
SFX 50 0 ою .
SFX 742 Y 1
SFX 742 0 ируете .
SFX 649 Y 1
SFX 649 0 нувши .
SFX 514 Y 1
SFX 514 0 щаяся .
SFX 1224 Y 1
SFX 1224 0 ствовавши .
SFX 1735 Y 1
SFX 1735 0 ковый .
SFX 1001 Y 1
SFX 1001 0 ковым .
SFX 2077 Y 1
SFX 2077 0 тому .
SFX 316 Y 1
SFX 316 0 остей .
SFX 2065 Y 1
SFX 2065 0 дов .
SFX 2791 Y 1
SFX 2791 0 дой .
SFX 2087 Y 1
SFX 2087 0 дом .
SFX 2011 Y 1
SFX 2011 0 овичей .
SFX 2100 Y 1
SFX 2100 0 овичем .
SFX 1882 Y 1
SFX 1882 0 ываниям .
SFX 52 Y 1
SFX 52 0 тся .
SFX 1706 Y 1
SFX 1706 0 ивавшею .
SFX 181 Y 1
SFX 181 0 аем .
SFX 1669 Y 1
SFX 1669 0 нёмте .
SFX 1753 Y 1
SFX 1753 0 цию .
SFX 1665 Y 1
SFX 1665 0 ция .
SFX 2016 Y 1
SFX 2016 0 ищу .
SFX 802 Y 1
SFX 802 0 ерах .
SFX 1961 Y 1
SFX 1961 0 изируешь .
SFX 2925 Y 1
SFX 2925 0 ящую .
SFX 1594 Y 1
SFX 1594 0 очны .
SFX 2868 Y 1
SFX 2868 0 ляете .
